Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 16 Emergency Search and Rescue

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 1, enacted a new chapter 15 in title 19 and Laws 2004, ch. 107, § 1, enacted a new §

19-15-101

. The provision added by Laws 2004, ch. 107, has been redesignated as §

19-16-101

with the chapter 16 heading “Emergency Search and Rescue” by the legislative service office.

§ 19-16-101.
Emergency authority to supervise air search and rescue.

If requested by a county sheriff or his designee, the military department may, under the supervision of the requesting sheriff or his designee, coordinate the air search and rescue of persons and aircraft made necessary by any emergency or disaster.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 107, § 1.